Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 16, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Savage; Road and Bridge Improvements 800,000 From the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, for a grant to the city of Savage to predesign and design the expansion of Quentin Avenue and reconstruction of two railroad bridges that pass over Quentin Avenue. deleted text begin The project area for this project is from approximately 600 feet to the south to approximately 600 feet to the north of the two railroad bridges that pass over Quentin Avenue.deleted text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond proceeds for the project in this subdivision are available until December 31, 2029.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end